Utah statutes.
78B-6-606.   Judgment of removal -- Costs -- Penalty by fine where state is
party.
If a defendant is found guilty of usurping, intruding into or unlawfully
holding or exercising an office, franchise, or privilege, the court shall
order the defendant removed from the office, and that the relator recover the
costs of pursuing the action.  The court may also, in its discretion, in
actions to which the state is a party impose upon the defendant a fine not
exceeding $5,000, to be paid to the state treasury.
